Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.170

Levy on jointly owned real estate.

If a judgment debtor owns real estate jointly or in common with any other person, only the debtor's interest may be levied on and sold on execution, and the sheriff's notice of sale shall describe the extent of the debtor's interest to be sold as accurately as possible.

[ 1987 c 442 s 417.]